Mississippi statutes. Title 65. Highways, Bridges and Ferries
Chapter 29. Ferries in Certain Counties

§ 65-29-1.
Certain counties authorized to levy tax.

An ad valorem tax of two mills on each dollar of the total assessed valuation of all the taxable property in each county or counties in the State of Mississippi in which there is located a city or town upon any river or waters, which rivers or waters separate two United States highways, which highways are separated by such water but are otherwise connected by the streets of a municipality in said county connecting said highways except for said water, is hereby levied on all said taxable property in said county in or for each year in which the principal of or interest on any bonds or other obligations issued by any municipality or county pursuant to this chapter becomes due. The receipts from said two-mill tax shall be withheld by the tax collector of said county, or by any other tax collecting agency authorized by law for the collection of said taxes, from receipts from state ad valorem taxes now in effect or which may be hereafter levied, so long as said state ad valorem shall be not less than the said two-mill tax herein levied. If no state ad valorem taxes equal to or greater than the said two-mill tax herein levied is levied, then, and in that event, the said two-mill tax herein levied shall continue to be levied and collected as herein provided in each such county or counties in or for each year in which the principal of or interest on any bonds or other obligations issued by any municipality pursuant to this chapter becomes due.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8481; Laws, 1934, ch. 218.

§ 65-29-3.
Tax receipts paid over to trustee or ferry fund.

Said tax collector, or any other tax collecting agency authorized by law for the collection of said taxes, shall pay over all moneys collected or to be collected as receipts from said two-mill tax to any trustee or successor thereto established as hereinafter in this chapter provided, and in the event that there is no such trustee, then said tax collector, or any other tax collecting agency authorized by law for collection of said taxes, shall pay over all such moneys into the county depository of each such county to the credit of a fund which shall be known as a “ferry fund.” Any such moneys so paid into the county depository of each such county to the credit of said “ferry fund” may be expended at the direction of the ferry commission appointed for any county ferry. In no county within the terms of this chapter shall there be withheld from the state treasury under the provisions of this chapter and Sections 59-7-1 through 59-7-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, for any one year an amount in excess of the receipts from said two-mill tax. The provisions of this chapter shall be deemed to be a contract with the holders of any bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8482; Laws, 1934, ch. 218.

§ 65-29-5.
County may operate ferry service.

The authorities of any county in which there is situated and located, in whole or in part, a county ferry, are hereby given the authority to engage in, either directly or through the commission hereinafter provided and designated and such other agencies as hereafter may be provided by law, promoting, developing, constructing, maintaining, and operating or contract to have operated a ferry or ferries and ferry service within the county and its jurisdiction and to the opposite shore of an adjoining county or state, and either directly or through the commission hereinafter provided, shall have the power to acquire, purchase, install, rent, lease, mortgage, or otherwise encumber, to construct, own, hold, maintain, equip, use, control, and operate wharves, piers, docks, quays, warehouses, other water and rail terminals, and other necessary structures and facilities needful for the convenient use of the same in the aid of ferry service from said county to adjoining county or state. The entire cost to any such county or city of engaging in such work or development shall not exceed the sum of two hundred thousand dollars for lands and equipment and annually not more than fifty thousand dollars for maintenance, repairs, and operations.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8483; Laws, 1934, ch. 218.

§ 65-29-7.
Collection of rents and charges.

Said county authorities or ferry commission if there be one shall, subject to and in accordance with any agreement or agreements as may be made by any such county or municipality with the purchaser or purchasers of bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this chapter, prescribe, levy, and collect all rents, fees, tolls, revenues, and other charges in connection with the use and occupancy of the aforesaid improvements and facilities, and shall pay over all net revenues derived from the operation of said improvements and facilities to any trustee, or successor thereto, established as hereinafter in this chapter provided. Net revenues shall be deemed to be such as may be defined in any agreement or agreements entered into between any such municipality and the purchaser or purchasers of any bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this chapter. The said ferry commission shall make an annual report to the governor of the State of Mississippi, to the county or municipality having such ferry, and to the state legislature.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8484; Laws, 1934, ch. 218; Laws, 1970, ch. 322, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1970.

§ 65-29-9.
Debt limitations not applicable.

The bonds or other obligations issued by any county or municipality of the State of Mississippi pursuant to this chapter shall not constitute a debt within the meaning of any statutory limitation as to the amount of debt which may be incurred by any such municipality or county. Nor shall such bonds or other obligations be payable out of any funds other than the revenue collected or collectible from the use of said docks, harbors, and facilities of whatsoever nature, if any, and out of the receipts from the said two-mill ad valorem tax or special levy made by any county or municipality in accordance with the provisions of Section 65-29-1.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8485; Laws, 1934, ch. 218.

§ 65-29-11.
Bonds authorized and books open to inspection.

Any municipality or county in which there is situated and located, in whole or in part, a ferry as aforesaid is hereby given authority, upon the adoption of a resolution to such effect, to issue bonds or other obligations for any or all of the purposes as in this chapter provided. The books of account and other sources of information pertaining to duties under the provisions of this chapter, or any ferry commission, municipality, or county affected by this chapter, shall be and remain at all times open to inspection and subject to audit by the holder or holders of any bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8486; Laws, 1934, ch. 218.

§ 65-29-13.
Powers of county or municipality.

In connection with the issuance of bonds or other obligations by any municipality and county pursuant to this chapter, or in order to secure the payment of said bonds or other obligations, such county or municipality shall have power:

To accept grants from the United States of America, the president of the United States, the federal emergency administration of public works, or such other agencies, instrumentalities, or corporations as may be designated or created to make grants or loans (hereinafter termed “federal agency”) pursuant to the National Industrial Recovery Act and any further act of the congress of the United States providing for the construction of useful public works (hereinafter termed “National Industrial Recovery Act”) for or in aid of work, development, or improvement authorized by this chapter.

To make such contracts and execute such instruments containing such provisions, covenants, and conditions as, in the discretion of the authorities of any such municipalities or county, may be necessary, proper, or advisable for the purpose of obtaining or securing grants, loans, or other financial assistance from any federal agency pursuant to the National Industrial Recovery Act; to make such further, different, or additional contracts and execute all instruments necessary or convenient in or for the furtherance of any work, development, or improvement, including but not limited to all property, real and personal, appurtenant thereto or connected therewith and the existing work, development, or improvement, if any, to which the work, development, or improvement authorized by this chapter is an extension, addition, betterment, or embellishment (hereinafter termed “work, development, or improvement”); to carry out and perform the terms and conditions of any such contract or instrument.

To pledge all or any part of the fees, rents, tolls, revenues, or other charges received or receivable by such municipality or county or ferry commission from any work, development, or improvement to which its right then exists or the right to which may thereafter come into existence.

To covenant against the pledging of all or any part of the fees, rents, tolls, revenues, or other charges received or receivable by such municipality or county or ferry commission, if any, from any work, transportation development, or improvement to which its right then exists or the right to which may thereafter come into existence.

To covenant against the encumbering of all or any part of any work, development, or improvement, or against permitting or suffering any lien thereon.

To covenant as to what other or additional debt may be incurred by such municipality or county.

To provide for the preparation, specifications, terms, form, registration, extension, execution, and authentication of any bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this chapter.

To provide for the replacement of lost, destroyed, or mutilated bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this chapter.

To covenant as to the fees, rents, revenues, or tolls to be charged, the amount to be raised each year or other period of time, and as to the use and disbursement to be made thereof.

To covenant to set aside or to pay over reserves and sinking funds and as to the disposal thereof.

To redeem prior to maturity, with or without premium, bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this chapter, to covenant for their prior redemption, and to provide the terms and conditions thereof.

To covenant against extending the time for the payment of the interest on or principal of the bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this chapter, directly or indirectly, by any means or in any manner.

To covenant as to books of account of such municipality or county, as to the inspection and audit thereof, and as to the accounting method.

To covenant as to the rights, liabilities, powers, and duties arising upon the breach by such municipality or county of any covenant, condition, or obligation assumed pursuant to this chapter.

To make such covenants and do any and all such acts and things as may be necessary, convenient, or desirable in order to secure any bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this chapter, or in the absolute discretion of the authorities of such municipality or county in order to make such bonds or other obligations more marketable, notwithstanding that such covenants, acts, or things may not be enumerated herein or expressly authorized herein; it being the intention hereby to give the authorities of any municipality or county issuing bonds or other obligations pursuant to this chapter the power to do all things in the issuance of said bonds or other obligations and for their execution that may not be inconsistent with the constitution of the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8487; Laws, 1934, ch. 218.

§ 65-29-15.
Power and duties of trustee.

Any municipality or county issuing bonds or other obligations pursuant to this chapter shall, so long as any such bonds or other obligations remain outstanding and unpaid, by resolution or resolutions duly adopted, authorize and appoint a trustee, satisfactory to the purchaser or purchasers of any bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this chapter, or any successor thereto, with the following powers and duties:

Such trustee so appointed, or any successor thereto, shall receive and receipt for all moneys collected or to be collected as receipts from the aforesaid two-mill tax by the aforesaid tax collector, or any other tax collecting agency authorized by law for the collection of said taxes, as provided in Section 65-29-1;

Such trustee so appointed, or any successor thereto, shall receive and receipt for all moneys paid or to be paid to it in accordance with Section 65-29-5, constituting the net revenues derived from the operation of the improvements and facilities authorized by this chapter;

Such trustee so appointed, or any successor thereto, shall deposit all moneys received or to be received in a special account or accounts in a bank or banks which are members of the federal reserve system, with such provisions for security therefor as may be incorporated in any agreement or agreements entered into between any such municipality and the purchaser or purchasers of any such bonds or other obligations;

Such trustee so appointed, or any successor thereto, shall use and apply all such moneys so received to the payment of principal of and interest on any bonds or other obligations issued by any municipality or county pursuant to this chapter, as the same become due, and shall use and apply any surplus remaining after such payment or payments for the prior redemption, with or without premium, of bonds or other obligations issued by any municipality or county pursuant to this chapter, or in accordance with the provisions of any agreement or agreements as may be made between any municipality issuing bonds or other obligations pursuant to this chapter and the purchaser or purchasers of such bonds or other obligations;

Such trustee so appointed, or any successor thereto, shall have and be vested with all rights, powers, and duties, in addition to the foregoing, as may be provided in any agreement or agreements between any municipality or county issuing bonds or other obligations pursuant to this chapter and the purchaser or purchasers of such bonds or other obligations;

Such trustee so appointed, or any successor thereto, shall, by an instrument of writing, accept such trust and shall file such written acceptance of such trust with the clerk of the municipality or county so appointing such trustee;

If such trustee so appointed, or any successor thereto, shall fail, neglect or refuse to perform any of the duties herein imposed or that may be imposed by reason of any of the provisions of any agreement or agreements as aforesaid, such trustee, or any successor thereto, shall, on the written request of twenty per centum or more in aggregate principal amount of the holder or holders of bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this chapter, be removed, by resolution duly adopted by the municipality or county, by which such trustee or any successor thereto, was appointed; and in such event, it shall be the duty of any such trustee so removed to effectuate a valid transfer of all moneys then in the possession or under the control of such trustee so removed to a duly appointed successor, and a failure on the part of such trustee so removed to do so shall constitute an embezzlement of such moneys and shall be punishable accordingly;

In the event any such trustee so appointed, or any successor thereto, shall be removed as hereinabove provided, it shall be the duty of any municipality or county which shall have removed any such trustee, immediately by resolution duly adopted to appoint a trustee, as successor thereto, who is satisfactory to said holder or holders of twenty per centum or more in aggregate principal amount of bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8488; Laws, 1934, ch. 218.

§ 65-29-17.
Bonds exempt from certain taxes.

Bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this chapter and any interest thereon or income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation, except gift, transfer, and inheritance taxes, in so far as may be within the power of the State of Mississippi so to provide.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8489; Laws, 1934, ch. 218.

§ 65-29-19.
General bond provisions.

The power to issue bonds or other obligations authorized by Section 65-29-11 shall be vested in, and may be exercised from time to time by, the governing body of any municipality or county described in said section. Such bonds or other obligations shall be authorized by resolution of the governing body of any such municipality and shall bear such date or dates, mature at such time or times, not exceeding twenty-five years from their respective dates, bear interest at such rate or rates, not exceeding six per centum per annum, be in such denomination, be in such form, either coupon or registered, carry such registration privileges, be executed in such manner, be payable in such medium of payment, at such place or places, and be subject to such terms of prior redemption, with or without premium, as such resolution or resolutions shall provide. Such bonds or other obligations may be sold at public or private sale for such price or prices as the governing body of such municipality or county shall determine, provided that the interest cost to maturity of the money received from any issue of said bonds or other obligations shall not exceed six per centum per annum. Such bonds or other obligations may be issued by any municipality or county described in Section 65-29-11 in a principal amount not exceeding in the aggregate two hundred thousand dollars, for any purpose or purposes authorized by said section. Such municipality or county shall have the power out of any funds available to purchase any bonds or other obligations issued by it pursuant to this chapter, and all bonds or other obligations so purchased shall be cancelled and no bonds or other obligations shall be issued in lieu thereof. In anticipation of the issuance of the definitive bonds authorized by this chapter, any such municipality or county may issue interim certificates. Such interim certificates shall be in such form, contain such terms, conditions, or provisions, bear such dates or date, and evidence such agreement or agreements relating to their discharge by payment or by the delivery of the definitive bonds, as such municipality or county by resolution of its governing body may determine. Any bonds, interim certificates, or other obligations issued pursuant to this chapter shall be fully negotiable within the meaning and for all the purposes of the Uniform Commercial Code of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8490; Laws, 1934, ch. 218.

§ 65-29-21.
Deposit of bond proceeds.

The proceeds from the sale of any bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this chapter shall be placed to the credit of such municipality, county, ferry commission, or trustee in a bank or banks which are members of the federal reserve system, may be withdrawn therefrom in accordance with any agreement or agreements entered into between such municipality and the purchaser or purchasers of such bonds or other obligations, and shall be used for no other purpose than the purpose or purposes set forth in the original resolution of the governing body of such municipality. Any officer or other person diverting or assisting to divert any such funds to any other purpose or purposes than the purpose or purposes originally set forth in said resolution of the governing body of said municipality or county shall be guilty of a felony and punishable accordingly, and shall be liable both personally and officially on bond for such diversion. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as a guarantee on the part of the State of Mississippi to pay the principal of or interest on any bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8491; Laws, 1934, ch. 218.

§ 65-29-23.
Mortgage to secure bonds.

Any municipality or county issuing bonds or other obligations pursuant to this chapter, by resolution or resolutions duly adopted, is hereby given authority to execute and deliver a mortgage or deed of trust in such form, with such validity, and with such remedies as at present authorized under the laws of the State of Mississippi, on any or all properties, improvements, and facilities, the acquisition, construction, maintenance, or operation of which are provided by this chapter. Such resolution or resolutions of said municipality or county shall prescribe the provisions, covenants, and conditions of any such mortgage or deed of trust. Such provisions, covenants, and conditions, if not self-executing, may be enforced by appropriate proceedings, either in law or in equity.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8492; Laws, 1934, ch. 218.

§ 65-29-25.
Ferry commission.

Said ferries may be maintained, purchased, and operated, or either, by the board of supervisors of each county which comes in under this chapter or by a ferry commission consisting of not more than three members, which ferry commission may be designated by the board of supervisors of each county. Such commission, if so designated, shall receive a salary of not to exceed four hundred ($400.00) dollars each per annum, to be paid out of the funds hereinabove designated as being set aside for ferry purposes.

Where said ferriage fund is being supplemented by funds as herein provided from any municipality or municipalities within said county, and said ferriage and other things pertaining thereto are to be supervised and operated by a ferry commission, then said commission shall be composed of the president of the board of supervisors of said county, the mayor or mayors of any such municipality or municipalities that may contribute to said fund as herein provided, and one other person to be chosen by the governor and who shall serve during the tenure of such ferry operation, shall act as chairman of said commission, and shall be the only member of said commission to receive compensation, such compensation to be paid out of funds hereinabove designated and set aside for ferry purposes and shall be fixed at $1,200.00 per annum.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8493; Laws, 1934, ch. 218.

§ 65-29-27.
Terminal municipality authorized to contribute to free ferry.

Any municipality within whose confines one of the terminals is located shall have the right, power, and authority, whether such municipality be special charter or otherwise, to set aside and appropriate from its general fund as much as three mills for the defraying of the expenses of operation of said free or limited free ferry service.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8494; Laws, 1934, ch. 218.

§ 65-29-29.
Chapter paramount to other laws.

This chapter, as to the subject matters hereof, shall supersede all other laws, general, special, or local, including charters of municipalities. Any municipality issuing bonds or other obligations pursuant to this chapter shall have no power thereafter to issue bonds or other obligations pursuant to the provisions of Sections 59-7-1 through 59-7-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, unless and until all bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this chapter, and interest thereon, have been fully paid and discharged.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8496; Laws, 1934, ch. 218.